Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1553.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 17-249, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE17-249. Inmate labor The commission may contract with the state department of corrections or ARCOR enterprises Arizona correctional industries for the use of inmate labor, including juveniles, in constructing, operating or maintaining game and fish facilities. END_STATUTE